Nebraska, session 109, LB619.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB619 LB619
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Department of Transportation shall award grants
jointly to cities of the primary class and the counties in which cities
of the primary class are located. Such grants shall be awarded for the
purpose of constructing motor vehicle transportation infrastructure that
connects a highway as defined in section 39-101 with the National System
of Interstate and Defense Highways.
(2) Any city of the primary class and county in which such city of
the primary class is located shall provide a report to the Department of
Transportation each year until all of the grant money is spent. Any grant
money not used for the intended purpose of the grant shall be repaid by
the city and county that received such grant to the Department of
Transportation. Any such repaid money shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate fifteen
million dollars from the General Fund in fiscal year 2025-26 to the
Department of Transportation for purposes of this section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-